Illinois, session 104th, HB4860.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Human Rights Act is amended by 5changing Section 3-105.3 as follows: 6    (775 ILCS 5/3-105.3 new)7    Sec. 3-105.3. Void agreements.8    (A) Every provision in an oral agreement or written 9instrument relating to real property suited for medical 10procedures that purports to forbid or restrict the conveyance, 11encumbrance, occupancy, or lease thereof on the basis of 12providing reproductive health care (as defined in Section 1-10 13of the Reproductive Health Act) is void, so long as voiding the 14provision would not place the instrument or agreement in 15conflict with another law. 16    (B) Every condition, restriction or prohibition, including 17a right of entry or possibility of reverter, which directly or 18indirectly limits the use or occupancy of real property suited 19for medical procedures on the basis of providing reproductive 20health care (as defined in Section 1-10 of the Reproductive 21Health Act) is void, so long as voiding the provision would not 22place the instrument or agreement in conflict with another 23law.  HB4860- 2 -LRB104 17155 JRC 30574 b1    (C) it is a civil rights violation to insert in a written 2instrument a provision that is void under this Section.